Nevada, session 83, AB385.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 278 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2, the
governing body of any county whose population is 700,000 or
-
*AB385*

– 2 –
more or the governing body of any city located within such a
county:
(a) Shall not adopt a building code, ordinance or take any
other action to prohibit or limit the use of a cooling tower system
which uses water in any project that requires 500 nominal tons or
more of cooling capacity, as determined by a professional engineer
licensed pursuant to chapter 625 of NRS and during a review of
the plans for the project by the governing body or an agency
thereof; and
(b) May establish a process to exempt from a prohibition or
limitation on the use of a cooling tower system which uses water in
the existing building codes or ordinances any project that meets
the requirements of paragraph (a).
2. The provisions of this section do not apply to any project
for industrial or warehouse purposes.
Sec. 2. NRS 278.010 is hereby amended to read as follows:
278.010 As used in NRS 278.010 to 278.630, inclusive, and
section 1 of this act, unless the context otherwise requires, the
words and terms defined in NRS 278.0103 to 278.0195, inclusive,
have the meanings ascribed to them in those sections.
Sec. 3. NRS 244.3675 is hereby amended to read as follows:
244.3675 Subject to the limitations set forth in NRS 244.368,
278.02315, 278.580, 278.582, 278.584, 278.5846, 278.586, 444.340
to 444.430, inclusive, and 477.030, and section 1 of this act, the
boards of county commissioners within their respective counties
may:
1. Regulate all matters relating to the construction,
maintenance and safety of buildings, structures and property within
the county.
2. Adopt any building, electrical, housing, plumbing or safety
code necessary to carry out the provisions of this section and
establish such fees as may be necessary. Except as otherwise
provided in NRS 278.580, these fees do not apply to the State of
Nevada or the Nevada System of Higher Education.
Sec. 4. NRS 268.413 is hereby amended to read as follows:
268.413 Subject to the limitations contained in NRS 244.368,
278.02315, 278.580, 278.582, 278.584, 278.5846, 278.586, 444.340
to 444.430, inclusive, and 477.030, and section 1 of this act, the
city council or other governing body of an incorporated city may:
1. Regulate all matters relating to the construction,
maintenance and safety of buildings, structures and property within
the city.
2. Adopt any building, electrical, plumbing or safety code
necessary to carry out the provisions of this section and establish
such fees as may be necessary. Except as otherwise provided in
-
*AB385*

– 3 –
NRS 278.580, those fees do not apply to the State of Nevada or the
Nevada System of Higher Education.
Sec. 5. Section 2.200 of the Charter of the City of Las Vegas,
being chapter 517, Statutes of Nevada 1983, at page 1400, is hereby
amended to read as follows:
Sec. 2.200 Powers of City Council: Buildings;
construction and maintenance regulations; building and safety
codes. Subject to the limitations which are contained in
NRS 278.580, 278.583 and 444.340 to 444.430, inclusive,
and section 1 of this act, the City Council may:
1. Regulate all matters which relate to the construction,
maintenance and safety of buildings, structures and property
within the City.
2. Adopt any building, electrical, plumbing, mechanical
or safety code which is necessary to carry out the provisions
of this section and establish such fees as may be necessary.
Sec. 6. Any ordinance, regulation or rule enacted by a county
or city before, on or after October 1, 2025, which conflicts with the
provisions of this act is void and unenforceable.
H
-
*AB385*